Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 13. Local Boundary Commission.

Administrative Code. —

For local boundary commission, see 3 AAC, part 15.

Sec. 44.33.810.
Local Boundary Commission.

There is in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development a Local Boundary Commission. The Local Boundary Commission consists of five members appointed by the governor for overlapping five-year terms. One member shall be appointed from each of the four judicial districts described in AS

22.10.010

and one member shall be appointed from the state at large. The member appointed from the state at large is the chair of the commission.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 44.33.812.
Powers and duties.

The Local Boundary Commission shall

make studies of local government boundary problems;

adopt regulations providing standards and procedures for municipal incorporation, annexation, detachment, merger, consolidation, reclassification, and dissolution; the regulations providing standards and procedures are subject to AS 29.04 — AS 29.10;

consider a local government boundary change requested of it by the legislature, the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development, or a political subdivision of the state; “boundary change” may not be construed to include a borough incorporation; and

develop standards and procedures for the extension of services and ordinances of incorporated cities into contiguous areas for limited purposes upon majority approval of the voters of the contiguous area to be annexed and prepare transition schedules and prorated tax mill levies as well as standards for participation by voters of these contiguous areas in the affairs of the incorporated cities furnishing services.

The Local Boundary Commission may

conduct meetings and hearings to consider local government boundary changes and other matters related to local government boundary changes, including extensions of services by incorporated cities into contiguous areas and matters related to extension of services; and

present to the legislature during the first 10 days of a regular session proposed local government boundary changes, including gradual extension of services of incorporated cities into contiguous areas upon a majority approval of the voters of the contiguous area to be annexed and transition schedules providing for total assimilation of the contiguous area and its full participation in the affairs of the incorporated city within a period not to exceed five years.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 86 SLA 2005; am § 4 ch 46 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (a) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For further provisions relating to powers and duties of the commission, see AS 29.06 and Alaska Const., art. X, § 12.

For statement of legislative intent applicable to the 2005 amendment of (a)(3) of this section, see § 1, ch. 86, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For standards for incorporation of cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 1.

For standards for incorporation of boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 2.

For standards for annexation to cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 3.

For standards for annexation to boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 4.

For standards for merger of municipalities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 5.

For standards for consolidation of municipalities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 6.

For standards for detachment from cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 7.

For standards for detachment from boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 8.

For standards for dissolution of cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 9.

For standards for dissolution of boroughs, see 3 AAC 110, art. 10.

For standards for deunification, see 3 AAC 110, art. 11.

For standards for reclassification of cities, see 3 AAC 110, art. 12.

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 5, ch. 46, SLA 2006, provides that a proposal that has not taken effect on or before May 28, 2006, and that has been initiated or considered under standards and procedures that do not meet the requirements of the 2006 amendment of (a)(2) of this section is void, but that the proposal may be initiated again under procedures that do meet the requirements of the 2006 amendment of (a)(2) of this section.

Opinions of attorney general. —

When grouped together, the powers and duties of the local boundary commission are as follows: (1) To consider any local government boundary change (Alaska Constitution art. X, § 12); (2) to present proposed changes to the legislature (Alaska Const., art. X, § 12; § 7, ch. 64, SLA 1959); (3) (subject to law) to establish procedures whereby boundaries may be adjusted by local action (Alaska Const., art. X, § 12); (4) to make studies of local government boundary problems (Sec. 7, ch. 64, SLA 1959); (5) to develop proposed standards and procedures for changing local boundary lines (Sec. 7, ch. 64, SLA 1959); (6) to hold hearings on proposed boundary changes (Sec. 7, ch. 64, SLA 1959). 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 30.

The local boundary commission has the power and authority to recommend borough boundaries to the legislature. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 30.

The commission has the authority to amend a petition for the annexation of an area to a municipality by changing the boundaries of the area proposed for annexation. This authority must, of course, be exercised in accordance with the applicable annexation regulations. October 25, 1982, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 44.33.814.
Meetings and hearings.

The chair of the commission or the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development with the consent of the chair may call a meeting or hearing of the Local Boundary Commission. All meetings and hearings shall be public.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 44.33.816.
Minutes and records.

The Local Boundary Commission shall keep minutes of all meetings and hearings. If the proceedings are transcribed, minutes shall be made from the transcription. The minutes are a public record. All votes taken by the commission shall be entered in the minutes.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 44.33.818.
Notice of public hearings.

Public notice of a hearing of the Local Boundary Commission shall be given in the area in which the hearing is to be held at least 15 days before the date of the hearing. The notice of the hearing must include the time, date, place, and subject of the hearing. The commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development shall give notice of the hearing at least three times in the press, through other news media, or by posting in a public place, whichever is most feasible.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 44.33.820.
Quorum.

Three members of the commission constitute a quorum for the conduct of business at a meeting. Two members constitute a quorum for the conduct of business at a hearing.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 44.33.822.
Boundary change.

A majority of the membership of the Local Boundary Commission must vote in favor of a proposed boundary change before it may be presented to the legislature.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 44.33.824.
Expenses.

Members of the Local Boundary Commission receive no pay but are entitled to the travel expenses and per diem authorized for members of boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 44.33.826.
Hearings on boundary changes.

A local government boundary change may not be proposed to the legislature unless a hearing on the change has been held in or in the near vicinity of the area affected by the change.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.

Sec. 44.33.828.
When boundary change takes effect.

When a local government boundary change is proposed to the legislature during the first 10 days of any regular session, the change becomes effective 45 days after presentation or at the end of the session, whichever is earlier, unless disapproved by a resolution concurred in by a majority of the members of each house.

History.

(§ 64 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For procedures for petitioning and for other commission matters, see 3 AAC 110, art. 13.